Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-102
University of Nebraska; object.

The object of such institution shall be to afford to the inhabitants of this state the means of acquiring a thorough knowledge of the various branches of literature, science and arts.

Laws 1869, § 2, p. 172;

R.S.1913, § 7082;

C.S.1922, § 6714;

C.S.1929, § 85-102;

R.S.1943, § 85-102.

Affording the means of acquiring a thorough knowledge of the various branches of literature, science and the arts is not the limit of the purposes, powers or activities of the University of Nebraska. Fisher v. Board of Regents, 108 Neb. 666, 189 N.W. 161 (1922).